Illinois, session 104th, SB3551.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Government Communications Transparency and Security Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act: 7    "Enable" includes to host, list, distribute, provision, 8facilitate, or otherwise make technically available for 9download, installation, activation, or use.10    "End-to-end encryption platform with autodeletion" means 11any application, software, service, or feature set that (i) 12provides end-to-end encryption such that only the sender and 13intended recipient can access message content; and (ii) 14includes any autodeletion capability, including, but not 15limited to, ephemeral or disappearing messages, timed 16deletion, auto-expiring threads, remote wipe of message 17content, or automatic redaction of message bodies or 18attachments. 19    "Government communication device" means any phone, 20computer, tablet, server, or other electronic communication 21device purchased, leased, issued, or reimbursed by a 22government entity for official use. 23    "Government employee" means an employee of a government   SB3551- 2 -LRB104 17473 BDA 30899 b1entity.2    "Government entity" means the State of Illinois, any State 3constitutional officer, State agency, State board, State 4commission, State university, school district, or unit of 5local government, including municipalities, counties, and 6special districts. 7    "Government officer" means an officer of a government 8entity. 9    Section 10. Prohibition. 10    (a) No government entity, government officer, or 11government employee shall download, install, access, activate, 12or use an end-to-end encryption platform with autodeletion on 13a government communication device. 14    (b) No Internet service provider, telecommunications 15carrier, server operator, mobile application marketplace, or 16digital platform doing business in the State shall enable the 17download, installation, activation, or operation of an 18end-to-end encryption platform with autodeletion on a 19government communication device. 20    (c) Internet service providers, telecommunications 21carriers, and digital platforms shall implement reasonable 22technological measures to block access to, installation of, or 23operation of end-to-end encryption platforms with autodeletion 24on government communication devices. 25    (d) A platform that allows administrator-level   SB3551- 3 -LRB104 17473 BDA 30899 b1configuration to disable end-to-end encryption or autodeletion 2features shall not be considered prohibited under this Section 3if those features are verifiably disabled and cannot be 4reenabled by an end user on the government communication 5device. 6    Section 15. Enforcement and penalties. 7    (a) A violation of subsection (a) of Section 10 by a 8government officer or government employee, if committed 9knowingly and with knowledge that the act is prohibited by 10law, constitutes official misconduct under paragraph (2) of 11subsection (a) of Section 33-3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 12    (b) Any Internet service provider, telecommunications 13carrier, server operator, mobile application marketplace, or 14digital platform that knowingly violates subsection (b) or (c) 15of Section 10 is subject to a civil penalty of not less than 16$50,000 for each violation. 17    (c) The Attorney General may bring a civil action to 18enforce this Act, including for injunctive relief, civil 19penalties, and recovery of attorney's fees and costs. 20    (d) Any Illinois taxpayer may bring an action in the name 21of the People of the State of Illinois to enjoin a continuing 22violation of subsection (b) or (c) of Section 10. Prevailing 23taxpayers shall be entitled to reasonable attorney's fees and 24costs.   SB3551- 4 -LRB104 17473 BDA 30899 b1    Section 20. Rulemaking. The Department of Innovation and 2Technology shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this 3Act, including standards for verifying government 4communication devices and procedures for compliance by 5telecommunications providers and platforms. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 71, 2027.